Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5121
Applicability of act.

An insurer's investments shall be subject to the Insurers Investment Act notwithstanding anything in 15 U.S.C. 77r-1 to the contrary.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 21.